Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF775.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [116J.9651] OMBUDSPERSON FOR SAFETY, HEALTH, AND WELL-BEING OF AGRICULTURAL AND FOOD PROCESSING WORKERS. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Definitions. new text end new text begin (a) For the purposes of this section, the following terms have the meanings given. new text end new text begin (b) "Agricultural worker" has the same meaning as section 181.85, subdivision 2. new text end new text begin (c) "Commissioner" means the commissioner of the Department of Employment and Economic Development. new text end new text begin (d) "Food processing" has the meaning given in section 181.635, subdivision 1, paragraph (d), and also includes meatpacking and poultry processing. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Ombudsperson established; purpose. new text end new text begin The ombudsperson for safety, health, and well-being of agricultural and food processing workers is established within the Department of Employment and Economic Development to assist agricultural and food processing workers with issues, including but not limited to housing, workplace safety, and fair labor standards in Minnesota. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Appointment. new text end new text begin The governor shall appoint an ombudsperson for safety, health, and well-being of agricultural and food processing workers. The ombudsperson shall serve in the unclassified service. No individual may serve as the ombudsperson for safety, health, and well-being of agricultural and food processing workers while running for or holding any other public office or while employed by, consulting with, or in any way affiliated with a person or entity that employs agricultural or food processing workers. The ombudsperson shall serve a term of four years, which may be renewed. The ombudsperson may be removed prior to the end of the term for just cause. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Qualifications. new text end new text begin (a) The ombudsperson must: new text end new text begin (1) be highly competent and qualified to analyze questions of law, administration, and public policy regarding the safety, health, and well-being of agricultural and food processing workers; new text end new text begin (2) have knowledge and experience in the fields of workplace safety, housing, and fair labor standards; new text end new text begin (3) be familiar with governmental entities and their roles, interpretation of laws and regulations, record keeping, report writing, public speaking, and management; new text end new text begin (4) have experience working with agricultural and food processing workers; and new text end new text begin (5) be knowledgeable about the needs and experiences of agricultural and food processing worker communities. new text end new text begin (b) The ombudsperson must speak fluently in a language in addition to English that is commonly used by agricultural and food processing workers. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Duties. new text end new text begin The ombudsperson must carry out the following activities: new text end new text begin (1) offer accessible methods of contact, including telephone, text, and virtual communication platforms, to answer questions, receive complaints, and discuss department actions with agricultural stakeholders; new text end new text begin (2) respond to requests for assistance, documenting complaints, and connecting workers to relevant agencies and service providers; and new text end new text begin (3) analyze complaints regarding agricultural and food processing workers' protections, identifying policies and practices in other states and countries, and making recommendations for legislative and other policy changes to improve the safety, health, and well-being of agricultural and food processing workers. new text end new text begin (b) In addition to the duties under paragraph (a), the ombudsperson must: new text end new text begin (1) provide intrastate agency coordination, policy reviews, and guidance that assist in supporting the safety, health, and well-being of agricultural and food processing workers; new text end new text begin (2) participate as a member of the Minnesota Migrant Services Consortium and participate in any work group or task force engaged in work related to agricultural and food processing workers; and new text end new text begin (3) participate in any interagency committee focusing on the safety, health, and well-being of agricultural and food processing workers to develop strategies to better assist agricultural and food processing workers. new text end new text begin (c) Capacity permitting, the ombudsperson shall: new text end new text begin (1) conduct outreach to interested and affected stakeholders, including but not limited to workers, employers, service providers, community organizations, legal advocates, and other advocates for agricultural and food processing workers, to inform them of the services of the ombudsperson and identify issues of concern; new text end new text begin (2) create, collect, and distribute educational materials in relevant languages to agricultural and food processing workers about their rights under Minnesota laws and rules, and inform agricultural and food processing workers about state services available to them. Materials must be made available in both physical and digital formats; new text end new text begin (3) educate and provide available resources to employers, workers, service providers, and advocates about workers' rights, employer responsibilities, and other relevant topics; and new text end new text begin (4) conduct other activities as needed to carry out this section. new text end new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Posting of complaints. new text end new text begin The ombudsperson must make any verified and unresolved complaints visible and accessible to the public by posting the complaints on the ombudsperson's website. new text end new text begin Subd. 7. new text end new text begin Reporting. new text end new text begin By December 31 of each year, the ombudsperson must report to the commissioner and chairs and ranking minority members of the relevant committees in the house of representatives and senate the agricultural and food processing worker activities conducted by the ombudsperson during the previous year. The report must also be filed with the Legislative Reference Library in compliance with section 3.195. The report must include, at a minimum: new text end new text begin (1) a summary of the ombudsperson's activities, detailing the services provided to agricultural and food processing workers, including the number of stakeholders served; new text end new text begin (2) the number, a summary, and an analysis of complaints received during the previous year; new text end new text begin (3) a description of all expenditures; new text end new text begin (4) any recommendations for legislative or other policy changes; and new text end new text begin (5) any other information specified by the commissioner. new text end new text begin Subd. 8. new text end new text begin Access to records. new text end new text begin (a) The ombudsperson for safety, health, and well-being of agricultural and food processing workers or the ombudsperson's designee, excluding volunteers, may have access to any data of a state agency necessary for the discharge of the ombudsperson's duties, including records classified as confidential data on individuals or private data on individuals under chapter 13 or any other law. The ombudsperson's data request must relate to a specific case and is subject to section 13.03, subdivision 4. If the data concerns an individual, the ombudsperson or designee shall first obtain the individual's consent. If the individual is unable to consent and has no parent or legal guardian, the ombudsperson's or designee's access to the data is authorized by this section. new text end new text begin (b) The ombudsperson and designee must adhere to chapter 13 and must not disseminate any private or confidential data on individuals unless specifically authorized by state, local, or federal law or pursuant to a court order. new text end new text begin Subd. 9. new text end new text begin Staff support. new text end new text begin The ombudsperson may select, appoint, and compensate from available funds a program manager, confidential secretary, and any other staff members necessary to carry out the duties under this section. The ombudsperson may delegate to staff members any authority or duties, except the duty to provide reports to the governor, commissioner, or legislature. new text end new text begin Subd. 10. new text end new text begin Independence of action. new text end new text begin In carrying out the duties required under this section, the ombudsperson may provide testimony to the legislature and make periodic reports to the legislature on areas of concern to agricultural and food processing workers. new text end new text begin Subd. 11. new text end new text begin Civil actions. new text end new text begin The ombudsperson and designee are not civilly liable for any action taken under this section if the action was taken in good faith, was within the scope of the duties of the ombudsperson for safety, health, and well-being of agricultural and food processing workers' authority, and did not constitute willful or reckless misconduct. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin APPROPRIATION.new text end new text begin $....... in fiscal year 2026 and $....... in fiscal year 2027 are appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of employment and economic development for the establishment and operations of the ombudsperson for safety, health, and well-being of agricultural and food processing workers under Minnesota Statutes, section 116J.9651. new text end